netlify/functions/hello-world/verbs.dix
    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_wuxAxi_iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_iw"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_wuxAxi_Iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_Iw"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_wuxAxi_D">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_D"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_wuxAxi_X">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_X"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_wuxAxi_t">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_t"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_ruXAxi_w">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_w"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_ruXAxi_iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_iw"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_ruXAxi_Iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_Iw"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_ruXAxi_D">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_D"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_ruXAxi_X">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_X"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_ruXAxi_t">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_t"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_wanAxi_w">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_w"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_wanAxi_iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_iw"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_wanAxi_Iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_Iw"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_wanAxi_D">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_D"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_wanAxi_X">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_X"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_wanAxi_t">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_t"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_kryAxi_w">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_w"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_kryAxi_iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_iw"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_kryAxi_Iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_Iw"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_kryAxi_D">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_D"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_kryAxi_X">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_X"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_kryAxi_t">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_t"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_curAxi_w">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_w"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_curAxi_iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_iw"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_curAxi_Iw">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_Iw"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_curAxi_iw_ay">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="ma_ay"/><par n="la_lut_A_iw"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_curAxi_Iw_ay">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="ma_ay"/><par n="la_lut_A_Iw"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_curAxi_D">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_D"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_curAxi_X">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_X"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lut_krm_curAxi_t">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lut_A_t"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_BvAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_iR"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_BvAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_IR"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_BvAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_R"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_BvAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_s"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_axAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_iR"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_axAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_IR"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_axAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_R"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_axAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_s"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_juhowyAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_iR"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_juhowyAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_IR"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_juhowyAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_R"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_juhowyAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_s"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_xivAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_iR"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_xivAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_IR"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_xivAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_R"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_xivAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_s"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_svAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_iR"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_svAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_IR"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_svAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_R"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_svAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_s"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_wuxAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_iR"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_wuxAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_IR"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_wuxAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_R"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_wuxAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_s"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_ruXAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_iR"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_ruXAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_IR"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_ruXAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_R"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_ruXAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_s"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_wanAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_iR"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="XA1"><i>XA</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_juhowyAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="kRi4"><i>kR</i><par n="mr_i_e"/><par n="var_4"/><par n="la_lut_krm_kryAxi_w"/></e>
    <e lm="XU1"><i>X</i><par n="mr_U_o"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_svAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="wQ1"><i>w</i><par n="mr_Q_ar"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_BvAxi_IR"/></e>
    <e lm="pQ1"><i>p</i><par n="mr_Q_ar"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_juhowyAxi_IR"/></e>
    <e lm="Gq2"><i>G</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_juhowyAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="JQ1"><i>J</i><par n="mr_Q_ar"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_xivAxi_IR"/></e>
    <e lm="vq1"><i>v</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_svAxi_IR"/></e>
    <e lm="gQ1"><i>g</i><par n="mr_Q_al"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_wuxAxi_Iw"/></e>
    <e lm="gQ1"><i>g</i><par n="mr_Q_al"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_wuxAxi_IR"/></e>
    <e lm="kq3"><i>k</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lut_krm_wanAxi_w"/></e>
    <e lm="vq2"><i>v</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lut_krm_kryAxi_Iw"/></e>
    <e lm="viR1"><i>v</i><par n="mr_i_e"/><par n="mr_R_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_BvAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="Nal1"><par n="mr_N_n"/><i>al</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_BvAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="yaB1"><i>ya</i><par n="mr_B_p"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_BvAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="vix1"><i>v</i><par n="mr_i_e"/><i>x</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_axAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="mqj2"><i>m</i><par n="mr_q_Ar"/><par n="mr_j_k"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_axAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="Rvap1"><par n="mr_R_s"/><i>vap</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_axAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="Nij2"><par n="mr_N_n"/><par n="mr_i_e"/><par n="mr_j_k"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_juhowyAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="vAS1"><i>vAS</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_xivAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="xuR1"><i>x</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><par n="mr_R_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_xivAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="kRam3"><i>kRa</i><par n="mr_m_M"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_xivAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="RAX1"><par n="mr_R_s"/><i>A</i><par n="mr_X_w"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_svAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="aS1"><i>aS</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_svAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="wqh3"><i>w</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><par n="md_h"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lut_krm_wuxAxi_D"/></e>
    <e lm="cut2"><i>cut</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_wuxAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="kqd1"><i>kqd</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_wuxAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="liS2"><i>l</i><par n="mr_i_e"/><par n="mr_S_R"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lut_krm_wuxAxi_t"/></e>
    <e lm="vix3"><i>v</i><par n="mr_i_e"/><par n="mr_x_w"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_wuxAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="Ric1"><par n="mr_R_s"/><par n="mr_i_e"/><par n="mr_c_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_wuxAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="ruX1"><i>r</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><par n="mr_X_x"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_ruXAxi_X"/></e>
    <e lm="piR1"><i>p</i><par n="mr_i_e"/><i>R</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_ruXAxi_t"/></e>
    <e lm="Banj1"><i>Ba</i><par n="mr_nj_fk"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_ruXAxi_w"/></e>
    <e lm="anj1"><i>a</i><par n="mr_nj_fk"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_ruXAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="wanc2"><i>wa</i><par n="mr_n_F"/><i>c</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_ruXAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="wanj1"><p><l>waFj</l><r>wanj</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_ruXAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="van3"><i>van</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lut_krm_wanAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="banX1"><i>ban</i><par n="mr_X_x"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_kryAxi_X"/></e>
    <e lm="manW2"><i>manW</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lut_krm_kryAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="viR3"><i>v</i><par n="mr_i_e"/><i>R</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lut_krm_kryAxi_t"/></e>
    <e lm="was2"><i>wa</i><par n="ma_M"/><i>s</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lut_krm_curAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="Baj2"><i>B</i><par n="mr_a_A"/><i>j</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lut_krm_curAxi_iw_ay"/></e>
